test/src/morphology/N-волна_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - волна M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      волна+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: волна́
      волна+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: волну́
      волна+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: волны́
      волна+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: волне́
      волна+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: волне́
      волна+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: волно́й
      волна+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: во́лны
      волна+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: во́лны
      волна+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: во́лн
      волна+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: волна́х
      волна+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: волна́м
      волна+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: волна́ми
